Hawaii statutes.
§10H-3 Native Hawaiian roll commission.
(a) There is established a five-member Native Hawaiian roll commission within
the office of Hawaiian affairs for administrative purposes only. The Native
Hawaiian roll commission shall be responsible for:

(1) Preparing and maintaining a roll of qualified
Native Hawaiians;

(2) Certifying that the individuals on the roll of
qualified Native Hawaiians meet the definition of qualified Native Hawaiians.
For purposes of establishing the roll, a "qualified Native Hawaiian"
means an individual whom the commission determines has satisfied the following
criteria and who makes a written statement certifying that the individual:

(A) Is:

(i) An individual who is a descendant of the
aboriginal peoples who, prior to 1778, occupied and exercised sovereignty in
the Hawaiian islands, the area that now constitutes the State of Hawaii;

(ii) An individual who is one of the
indigenous, native people of Hawaii and who was eligible in 1921 for the
programs authorized by the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, or a direct
lineal descendant of that individual; or

(iii) An individual who meets the ancestry
requirements of Kamehameha Schools or of any Hawaiian registry program of the
office of Hawaiian affairs;

(B) Has maintained a significant cultural,
social, or civic connection to the Native Hawaiian community and wishes to
participate in the organization of the Native Hawaiian governing entity; and

(C) Is eighteen years of age or older;

(3) Receiving and maintaining documents that verify
ancestry; cultural, social, or civic connection to the Native Hawaiian
community; and age from individuals seeking to be included in the roll of
qualified Native Hawaiians. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
these verification documents shall be confidential; and

(4) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
including in the roll of qualified Native Hawaiians all individuals already
registered with the State as verified Hawaiians or Native Hawaiians through the
office of Hawaiian affairs as demonstrated by the production of relevant office
of Hawaiian affairs records, and extending to those individuals all rights and
recognitions conferred upon other members of the roll.

(b) No later than one hundred eighty days
after [July 6, 2011], the governor shall appoint the members of the Native
Hawaiian roll commission from nominations submitted by qualified Native
Hawaiians and qualified Native Hawaiian membership organizations. For the
purposes of this subsection, a qualified Native Hawaiian membership
organization includes an organization that, on [July 6, 2011], has been in
existence for at least ten years, and whose purpose has been and is the
betterment of the conditions of the Native Hawaiian people.

In selecting the five members from nominations
submitted by qualified Native Hawaiians and qualified Native Hawaiian
membership organizations, the governor shall appoint the members as follows:

(1) One member shall reside in the county of Hawaii;

(2) One member shall reside in the city and county of
Honolulu;

(3) One member shall reside in the county of Kauai;

(4) One member shall reside in the county of Maui;
and

(5) One member shall serve at-large.

(c) A vacancy on the commission shall not
affect the powers of the commission and shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment.

(d) Members of the commission shall serve
without compensation but shall be allowed travel expenses, including per diem
in lieu of subsistence while away from their homes or regular places of
business in the performance of services for the commission.

(e) The commission, without regard to chapter
76, may appoint and terminate an executive director and other additional
personnel as are necessary to enable the commission to perform the duties of
the commission.

(f) The commission may fix the compensation of
the executive director and other commission personnel.

(g) The commission may procure temporary and
intermittent services. [L 2011, c 195, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 84, §1; am L
2013, c 77, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next